Illinois, session 104th, SB2072.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 11.5 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/11.5)7    Sec. 11.5. Standardization of food labeling.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Quality date" means a date on a label affixed to the 10packaging or a container of food that communicates to 11consumers the date after which the food quality may begin to 12deteriorate but the food may still be acceptable for 13consumption.14    "Safety date" means a date on a label affixed to the 15packaging or container of food that communicates to consumers 16that the food should be consumed or frozen, if appropriate, by 17the date listed on the package that applies to perishable 18products with potential safety implications over time.19    "Sell by date" means a date on a label affixed to the 20packaging or container of food that is intended to communicate 21primarily to a distributor or retailer for purposes of stock 22rotation and is not a quality date or a safety date.23    (b) The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with   SB2072- 2 -LRB104 07459 BDA 17500 b1the Department of Public Health, shall, on or before July 1, 22024, publish information to encourage food manufacturers, 3processors, and retailers responsible for the labeling of food 4products to voluntarily use the following uniform terms on 5food product labels to communicate quality dates and safety 6dates:7        (1) "BEST if Used by" or "BEST if Used or Frozen by" to 8    indicate the quality date of a product; and9        (2) "USE by" or "USE by or Freeze by" to indicate the 10    safety date of a product.11    The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the 12Department of Public Health, shall, on or before July 1, 2027, 13adopt rules requiring food product labels to contain the 14information detailed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 15subsection (b). The Department of Agriculture shall provide 16exceptions for eggs, beer and other malt beverages, and as 17limited by federal law. A violation of any rule adopted under 18this subsection shall be punishable by a civil penalty of $100 19per violation. 20    (c) The Department of Agriculture shall promote the 21consistent use of the terms specified pursuant to subsection 22(b) in the course of its existing interactions with food 23manufacturers, processors, and retailers.24    (d) In the process of implementing subsection (b), the 25Department shall encourage food distributors and retailers to 26develop alternatives to consumer-facing "sell by" dates.  SB2072- 3 -LRB104 07459 BDA 17500 b1    (e) The Department may accept nonstate funds from public 2and private sources to educate consumers about the meaning of 3the quality dates and safety dates specified in this Section. 4Funds accepted by the Department pursuant to this subsection 5shall be deposited into the Food and Drug Safety Fund.6(Source: P.A. 103-208, eff. 1-1-24.)